Utah statutes.
32A-7-102.   Application requirements.
(1)  A qualified applicant for a single event permit shall file a written
application with the department in a form as the department shall prescribe.
(2)  The application shall be accompanied by:
(a)  a single event permit fee of $100, which is refundable if a single event
permit is not issued and shall be returned to the applicant with the
application;
(b)  written consent of the local authority;
(c)  a bond as specified by Section 32A-7-105;
(d)  the times, dates, location, estimated attendance, nature, and purpose of
the event;
(e)  a description or floor plan designating:
(i)  the area in which the applicant proposes that alcoholic beverages be
stored;
(ii)  the site from which the applicant proposes that alcoholic beverages be
sold or served; and
(iii)  the area in which the applicant proposes that alcoholic beverages be
allowed to be consumed;
(f)  a statement of the purpose of the:
(i)  partnership;
(ii)  corporation;
(iii)  limited liability company;
(iv)  church;
(v)  political organization;
(vi)  incorporated association; or
(vii)  recognized subordinate lodge, chapter, or other local unit of an entity
described in Subsections (2)(f)(i) through (vi);
(g)  a signed consent form stating that authorized representatives of the
commission, department, or any law enforcement officers will have unrestricted
right to enter the premises during the event;
(h)  proper verification evidencing that the person signing the application is
authorized to act on behalf of the:
(i)  partnership;
(ii)  corporation;
(iii)  limited liability company;
(iv)  church;
(v)  political organization;
(vi)  incorporated association;
(vii)  recognized subordinate lodge, chapter, or local unit of an entity
described in Subsections (2)(h)(i) through (vi);
(viii)  state agency; or
(ix)  political subdivision of the state including:
(A)  a county; or
(B)  a municipality;
(i)  a request for the single event permit to be for a time period:
(i)  described in Subsection 32A-7-101(2)(a)(i)(A); or
(ii)  described in Subsection 32A-7-101(2)(a)(i)(B);
(j)  if submitting the first request for single event permit in a calendar
year, a request that the single event permit be considered under Subsection
32A-7-101(3)(a) or 32A-7-101(3)(b); and
(k)  any other information as the commission or department may direct.
(3)  An applicant need not meet the requirements of Subsections (2)(a), (b),
(c), and (f) if the applicant is:
(a)  a state agency; or
(b)  a political subdivision of the state including:
(i)  a county; or
(ii)  a municipality.
